Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Article 9. Derivative Actions.

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, §§ 904-909.

Sec. 32.11.490.
Derivative action authorized.

A limited partner may bring an action in the right of a limited partnership to recover a judgment in its favor if general partners with authority to do so have refused to bring the action or if an effort to cause those general partners to bring the action is not likely to succeed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Collateral references. —

Right of limited partner to maintain derivative action on behalf of partnership. 26 ALR4th 264.

Sec. 32.11.500.
Proper plaintiff.

In a derivative action, the plaintiff must be a partner at the time of bringing the action and

must have been a partner at the time of the transaction of which the plaintiff complains; or

the plaintiff’s status as a partner must have devolved upon the plaintiff by operation of law or under the terms of the partnership agreement from a person who was a partner at the time of the transaction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.510.
Pleading.

In a derivative action, the complaint must set out with particularity the effort of the plaintiff to secure initiation of the action by a general partner or the reasons for not making the effort.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 8, see § 4, ch. 128, SLA 1992 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 32.11.520.
Recoveries.

If a derivative action is successful, in whole or in part, or if anything is received by the plaintiff as a result of a judgment, compromise, or settlement of an action or claim, and if the plaintiff is awarded attorney fees or costs, the court shall direct the plaintiff to remit to the limited partnership the portion of the recovery that remains after deduction of the attorney fees and costs awarded to the plaintiff.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)